Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2,152
Amendment by board of directors
and shareholders.

(MBCA
10.03) If a corporation has issued shares, an amendment to the articles of
incorporation shall be adopted in the following manner:

(1) The proposed amendment
must be adopted by the board of directors.

(2) Except as provided in sections 21-2,154, 21-2,156,
and 21-2,157, after adopting the proposed amendment the board of directors
must submit the amendment to the shareholders for their approval. The board
of directors must also transmit to the shareholders a recommendation that
the shareholders approve the amendment unless (i) the board of directors makes
a determination that because of conflicts of interest or other special circumstances
it should not make such a recommendation or (ii) section 21-2,101 applies.
If subdivision (2)(i) or (ii) of this section applies, the board must transmit
to the shareholders the basis for so proceeding.

(3) The board of directors may condition
its submission of the amendment to the shareholders on any basis.

(4) If the amendment
is required to be approved by the shareholders and the approval is to be given
at a meeting, the corporation must notify each shareholder, whether or not
entitled to vote, of the meeting of shareholders at which the amendment is
to be submitted for approval. The notice must state that the purpose, or one
of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the amendment and must contain
or be accompanied by a copy of the amendment.

(5) Unless the articles of incorporation,
or the board of directors acting pursuant to subdivision (3) of this section,
requires a greater vote or a greater number of shares to be present, approval
of the amendment requires the approval of the shareholders at a meeting at
which a quorum consisting of at least a majority of the votes entitled to
be cast on the amendment exists, and, if any class or series of shares is
entitled to vote as a separate group on the amendment, except as provided
in subsection (c) of section 21-2,153, the approval of each such separate
voting group at a meeting at which a quorum of the voting group consisting
of at least a majority of the votes entitled to be cast on the amendment by
that voting group exists.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 152.
January 1, 2016